Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 4

Metro Sheriffs' Restitution Act of 1978

7-3-401. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Metro Sheriffs' Restitution Act of 1978.”

Acts 1978, ch. 698, § 1; T.C.A., § 6-3739.

Cross-References. Restitution centers and industries, title 41, ch. 6.

7-3-402. Establishment of program.

The sheriff of any county having a metropolitan form of government is authorized to establish a residential restitution program for the purpose of allowing persons convicted of felony offenses and sentenced to the workhouse of such counties to reimburse the victim for the value of property stolen, or for damage caused by such offenses. The sheriff may promulgate rules and regulations necessary to administer the program, and the program shall be carried out using present facilities and administrative staff. Before any inmate is accepted into a restitution program, the inmate shall enter into an agreement to abide by the rules, regulations and special conditions established by the sheriff or the sheriff's designees. No inmate convicted of a felony for which the maximum punishment actually imposed is greater than five (5) years shall be eligible for such a program.

Acts 1978, ch. 698, § 2; T.C.A., § 6-3739.

7-3-403. Deposit of wages — Charges for board.

When inmates are employed and participating in this program, the sheriff or the sheriff's designees shall require that inmates turn wages and salaries over to the sheriff or the sheriff's designees when received and the sheriff or the sheriff's designees shall deposit such money in trust accounts. Ledgers shall be maintained reflecting the status of individual accounts.

Each inmate shall be liable for reasonable charges for board as fixed by law.

Acts 1978, ch. 698, § 3; T.C.A., § 6-3739.

7-3-404. Disbursement of wages.

After initial payment of board, the wages and salaries of inmates shall be disbursed for the following purposes in the order set forth:

Reimbursement to the victims of the offense in the amounts and in the manner set forth in the contract executed between the inmate, victim and the sheriff of such county;

Support of dependents, if any, in amounts fixed by the sheriff of such counties or the sheriff's designees;

Payment of any outstanding court costs assessed against the inmate;

Payment in full or ratably of the inmate's written obligations; and

The balance, if any, to the inmate upon discharge from confinement.

Acts 1978, ch. 698, § 4; T.C.A., § 6-3739.

7-3-405. Selection of inmate participants.

Participating inmates shall be carefully screened and the committing courts shall be consulted before an inmate is placed in the restitution program.

Acts 1978, ch. 698, § 5; T.C.A., § 6-3739.